Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
PUBLIC PROJECTS

30-20-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governmental agency" means any county or municipality in the state only.

"Public project" means any lands, buildings, structures, works, machinery, equipment, or facilities suitable for and intended for use as public property for public purposes or suitable for and intended for use in the promotion of the public health, public education (where county boundaries and school district boundaries are coterminous), public welfare, or the conservation of natural resources, including the planning of any such lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, machinery, equipment, or facilities, and shall also include existing lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, and facilities, as well as improvements, renovations, or additions to any such lands, buildings, improvements, structures, works, or facilities.

"Public purposes" includes, but is not limited to, the supplying of public water services and facilities, public sewer services and facilities, and lands, buildings, improvements, equipment, and facilities for public education (where county boundaries and school district boundaries are coterminous).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 259, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-1.

L. 57:

p. 315, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-1.

L. 71:

p. 339, § 1.

L. 77:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 1448, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 78:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) repealed, pp. 272, 273, §§ 93, 94, effective May 23.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 744, § 6, effective April 4.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this part 3, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-20-302. Public improvements within and without boundaries.

Any governmental agency may acquire, construct, maintain, add to, and improve any public project, which public project may be located within or without or partly within and partly without the territorial limits of such governmental agency.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 259, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 7, effective April 4.

30-20-303. Anticipation warrants.

For the purpose of defraying the cost of construction, erection, reconstruction, or improvement of existing facilities, the legislative body of any governmental agency may, pursuant to a resolution or ordinance, issue anticipation warrants, which order, resolution, or ordinance shall set forth the proposed public project, the amount of warrants to be issued, and the maximum rate of interest. In every instance, the order, resolution, or ordinance shall provide that the project is being undertaken under the provisions of this part 3.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 259, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 8, effective April 4.

30-20-304. Power to lease.

Any governmental agency is authorized to rent or lease such public project or any portion thereof to any persons, partnerships, associations, or corporations, either public or private.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-4.

30-20-305. Terms and interest.

All anticipation warrants issued under the provisions of this part 3 shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding a net effective interest rate to be established by the official legislative body of the governmental agency prior to the sale or issuance of such warrants. All warrants shall be executed in such a manner and be payable serially in annual installments beginning not later than two years and extending not more than twenty years from the date thereof and at such place as the governmental agency determines.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-5.

L. 57:

p. 315, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-5.

L. 69:

p. 233, § 1.

L. 70:

p. 147, § 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 9, effective April 4.

30-20-306. Revenue and sinking fund - pledge of general income prohibited.

The official legislative body of any governmental agency is authorized to set aside a special sinking fund in the office of the treasurer of the governmental agency for the payment of anticipation warrants authorized by and issued under the provisions of this part 3 and for the payment of interest due on such warrants; except that the general income of the governmental agency shall not be pledged for the payment of the principal of the warrants and interest thereon. The treasurer of the governmental agency shall deposit in said sinking fund all rents, royalties, fees, rates, and charges derived from or rendered by the project.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-6.

L. 57:

p. 316, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 10, effective April 4.

30-20-307. Donations or gifts.

Any governmental agency is authorized to accept donations or gifts to the public project from any source, to be used in the best interests of such project.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-7.

30-20-308. Authentication before delivery.

In case any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear on the said anticipation warrants or coupons attached thereto cease to be such officers before delivery of such warrants, such signatures and countersignatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, with the same force and effect as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-8.

30-20-309. Obligations payable from project revenue only.

Nothing in this part 3 shall be construed to authorize or permit any governmental agency to incur any obligation of any kind or nature, except such as shall be payable solely from moneys accruing to the special sinking fund created pursuant to section 30-20-306, and it shall be plainly stated on the face of each warrant that has been issued under the provisions of this part 3 that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the governmental agency within the meaning of any constitutional provision or limitation.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 260, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 744, § 11, effective April 4.

30-20-310. Numbering and retirement.

The anticipation warrants issued under this part 3 shall be serially numbered and shall be paid off and retired in the order in which they were issued.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 261, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 36-20-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-19-10.